Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202572-2101
Governor's Residence Advisory Commission; created; duties; termination.

The Governor's Residence Advisory Commission is created. The commission terminates on July 1, 2026. The commission shall conduct an annual inspection of the Governor's residence. A report on the inspection shall be submitted to the Governor within thirty days after the day of the inspection. The report shall include recommendations for major maintenance or repair projects, if needed. Implementation and priority of an approved major maintenance or repair project shall be determined by the Governor in cooperation with the Director of Administrative Services. Additionally, no changes, additions, deletions, or other alterations to the residence, including its exterior, interior, decorative objects, contents, or grounds shall be made without the prior approval of the commission, except for the Governor's private living quarters located on the second floor of the residence.

Sections 72-2101 to 72-2105 terminate on July 1, 2026.

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 28;

Laws 2009, LB207, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 49.